en: E163d, Pelargonidin
xx: E163d
ar: E163d, بيلارغونيدين
az: E163d, Pelarqonidin
bg: E163d, Пеларгонидин
ca: E163d, Pelargonidina
cs: E163d, Pelargonidin
da: E163d, Pelargonidin
de: E163d, Pelargonidin
el: E163d, Πελαργονιδίνη
eo: E163d, Pelargonidino
es: E163d, Pelargonidina
et: E163d, Pelargoniin
fa: E163d, پلارگونیدین
fi: E163d, Pelargonidiini, Pelargonidiiniä
fr: E163d, Pélargonidine
he: E163d, פלרגונידין
hu: E163d, Pelargonidin
id: E163d, Pelargonidin
it: E163d, Pelargonidina
ja: E163d, ペラルゴニジン
ko: E163d, 펠라르고니딘
lt: E163d, Pelargonidinas
lv: E163d, Pelargonidīns
mk: E163d, Пеларгонидин
ms: E163d, Pelargonidin
mt: E163d, Pelargonidin
nl: E163d, Pelargonidine
pl: E163d, Pelargonidyna
pt: E163d, Pelargonidina
ro: E163d, Pelargonidină
ru: E163d, Пеларгонидин
sk: E163d, Pelargonidín
sl: E163d, Pelargonidin
sq: E163d, Pelargonidin
sv: E163d, Pelargonidin
th: E163d, เพลาร์โกนิดิน
tr: E163d, Pelargonidin
uk: E163d, Пеларгонідин
vi: E163d, Pelargonidin
zh: E163d, 飞燕草素

en: E163e, Peonidin
xx: E163e
ar: E163e, بيونيدين
az: E163e, Peonidin
bg: E163e, Пеонидин
ca: E163e, Peonidina
cs: E163e, Peonidin
da: E163e, Peonidin
de: E163e, Peonidin
el: E163e, Παιονιδίνη
eo: E163e, Peonidino
es: E163e, Peonidina
et: E163e, Peonidiin
fa: E163e, پیونیدین
fi: E163e, Peonidiini, Peonidiiniä
fr: E163e, Péonidine
he: E163e, פאונידין
hi: E163e, पियोनिडिन
hr: E163e, Peonidin
hu: E163e, Peonidin
id: E163e, Peonidin
it: E163e, Peonidin
ja: E163e, ペオニジン
ko: E163e, 페오니딘
lt: E163e, Peonidinas
lv: E163e, Peonidīns
mk: E163e, Peonidin
ms: E163e, Peonidin
mt: E163e, Peonidin
nl: E163e, Peonidine
pl: E163e, Peonidyna
pt: E163e, Peonidina
ro: E163e, Peonidină
ru: E163e, Пеонидин
sk: E163e, Peonidín
sl: E163e, Peonidin
sq: E163e, Peonidin
sv: E163e, Peonidin
th: E163e, พีโอนิดิน
tr: E163e, Peonidin
uk: E163e, Пеонідин
vi: E163e, Peonidin
zh: E163e, 芍药苷

en: E163f, Petunidin
xx: E163f
bg: E163f, Petunidin
cs: E163f, Petunidin
da: E163f, Petunidin
de: E163f, Petunidin
el: E163f, Petunidin
es: E163f, Petunidin
et: E163f, Petunidin
fi: E163f, Petunidiini, Petunidiiniä
fr: E163f, Pétunidine
hu: E163f, Petunidin
it: E163f, Petunidin
lt: E163f, Petunidin
lv: E163f, Petunidin
mt: E163f, Petunidin
nl: E163f, Petunidin
pl: E163f, Petunidyna, Petunidin
pt: E163f, Petunidin
ro: E163f, Petunidin
sk: E163f, Petunidin
sl: E163f, Petunidin
sv: E163f, Petunidin

en: E164, saffron, Gardenia Yellow
xx: E164
af: E164, saffraan
an: E164, zafrán
ar: E164, زعفران
az: E164, زافران
be: E164, шафран
bg: E164, шафран
bn: E164, জাফরান
br: E164, safron
bs: E164, šafran
ca: E164, safrà
cs: E164, šafrán
da: E164, safran
de: E164, Safran
dv: E164, ކުކުން
el: E164, σαφράνι
eo: E164, safrano
es: E164, azafrán
et: E164, safran
eu: E164, azafrai
fa: E164, زعفران
fi: E164, sahrami, sahramia
fr: E164, safran, Jaune de gardénia
ga: E164, cróch
gl: E164, azafrán
he: E164, זעפרן
hi: E164, केसर
hr: E164, šafran, šafrana
hu: E164, šafran
id: E164, kuma-kuma
io: E164, safrano
is: E164, saffran
it: E164, zafferano
ja: E164, サフラン
kn: E164, ಕೇಸರಿ
ko: E164, 사프란
la: E164, safranum
lb: E164, safran
lt: E164, safrāns
lv: E164, safrāns
ml: E164, കുങ്കുമം
mr: E164, केशर
ms: E164, safron
my: E164, ကုံကုမံ
nb: E164, safran
ne: E164, केशर
nl: E164, saffraan
nn: E164, safran
oc: E164, safran
pa: E164, ਕੇਸਰ
pl: E164, szafran
ps: E164, ګنګو
pt: E164, açafrão
ro: E164, șofran
ru: E164, шафран
sa: E164, केसरम्
sc: E164, zafferano
sd: E164, زعفران
sh: E164, šafran
si: E164, කුංකුම
sl: E164, žafran
sr: E164, шафран
sv: E164, saffran
ta: E164, குங்குமப்பூ
te: E164, కుంకుమ పువ్వు
th: E164, หญ้าฝรั่น
tr: E164, safran
uk: E164, шафран
ur: E164, زعفران
vi: E164, saffron
yi: E164, זאפרען
zh: E164, 番紅花

en: E165, Gardenia Blue
xx: E165
bg: E165, Гардения синя
cs: E165, Modrá gardénie
da: E165, Gardenia Blå
de: E165, Gardenia Blau
el: E165, Μπλε γαρδένια
es: E165, Azul de Gardenia
et: E165, Gardenia Sinine
fi: E165, Gardenian sininen
fr: E165, Bleu de gardénia
hu: E165, Gardénia kék, Kék gardénia
it: E165, Blu di Gardenia
lt: E165, Gardenijos mėlyna
lv: E165, Zilā gardēnija
mt: E165, Blu tal-Gardenia
nl: E165, Gardenia Blauw
pl: E165, Gardenia niebieski, Niebieski gardenii
pt: E165, Azul de Gardenia
ro: E165, Albastru de gardénia
ru: E165, Гардения синяя, Синий гардения
sk: E165, Modrá gardénia
sl: E165, Modra gardenija
sv: E165, Gardenia Blå

en: E166, Sandalwood
xx: E166
bg: E166, Сандалово дърво
cs: E166, Santalovník
da: E166, Sandeltræ
de: E166, Sandelholz
el: E166, Σανδαλόξυλο
es: E166, Sándalo
et: E166, Sandlipuu
fi: E166, Santelipuu, Santelipuuta
fr: E166, Bois de santal, extrait de bois de santal rouge, extrait de bois de santal
hu: E166, Szantálfa, vörös szantálfa kivonat, szantálfa kivonat
it: E166, Sandalo
lt: E166, Sandalmedis
lv: E166, Sandalkoks
mt: E166, Sandal
nl: E166, Sandelhout
pl: E166, Drzewo sandałowe
pt: E166, Sândalo
ro: E166, Lemn de santal
sk: E166, Santalovník
sl: E166, Sandalovina
sv: E166, Sandelträ

en: E170, Calcium carbonates
xx: E170
af: E170, Kalsiumkarbonate
ar: E170, مجموعة كربونات الكالسيوم
az: E170, Kalsium karbonatlar
be: E170, Карбанаты кальцыю
bg: E170, Калциеви карбонати
bn: ক্যালসিয়াম কার্বোনেটস
ca: E170, Carbonats de calci
cs: E170, Uhličitany vápenaté
da: E170, calciumkarbonater, calciumcarbonater
de: E170, Calciumcarbonate
el: E170, ανθρακικά άλατα ασβεστίου
eo: E170, Kalcia karbonatoj
es: E170, Carbonatos de calcio
et: E170, Kaltsiumkarbonaadid
eu: E170, Kaltzio karbonatoak
fa: E170, کربنات کلسیم
fi: E170, Kalsiumkarbonaatit
fr: E170, Carbonates de calcium
ga: E170, Carbónáití cailciam
gl: E170, Carbonatos de calcio
he: E170, קרבונטים של סידן
hi: E170, कैल्शियम कार्बोनेट
hr: E170, Kalcijevi karbonati
hu: E170, Kalcium-karbonátok
id: E170, Kalsium karbonat
is: E170, Kalsíumkarbónöt
it: E170, Carbonati di calcio
ja: E170, 炭酸カルシウム族
jv: E170, Kalsium karbonat
ko: E170, 탄산 칼슘 계열
lt: E170, Kalcio karbonatai
lv: E170, Kalcija karbonāti
mk: E170, Калциум карбонати
ms: E170, Kalsium karbonat
mt: E170, Karbonati tal-kalċju
nl: E170, Calciumcarbonaten
nn: E170, Kalsiumkarbonatar
no: E170, Kalsiumkarbonater
pl: E170, Węglany wapnia
pt: E170, Carbonatos de cálcio
ro: E170, Carbonați de calciu
ru: E170, Карбонаты кальция
sk: E170, Uhličitany vápnika
sl: E170, Kalcijevi karbonati
sq: E170, Karbonatet kalcium
sr: E170, Калцијум карбонати
sv: E170, Kalciumkarbonater
th: E170, กลุ่มแคลเซียมคาร์บอเนต
tr: E170, Kalsiyum karbonatlar
uk: E170, Карбонати кальцію
vi: E170, Cacbonat canxi
zh: E170, 碳酸钙

en: E170(i), Calcium carbonate, CI Pigment White 18, Chalk
xx: E170(i)
af: E170(i), Kalsiumkarbonaat
an: E170(i), Carbonato calcico
ar: E170(i), كربونات الكالسيوم
bg: E170(i), Калциев карбонат, CI бял пигмент 18
bn: E170(i), ক্যালসিয়াম কার্বনেট
bs: E170(i), Kalcij-karbonat
ca: E170(i), Carbonat de calci
cs: E170(i), Uhličitan vápenatý, CI bílý pigment 18
cy: E170(i), calsiwm carbonad
da: E170(i), calciumkarbonat, calciumcarbonat, CI Pigment White 18
de: E170(i), Calciumcarbonat, Pigment White 18, Kalk, Calcium-carbonat, Kalziumkarbonat
el: E170(i), Ανθρακικο ασβεστιο, Λευκό CI Pigment 18
eo: E170(i), kalcia karbonato
es: E170(i), Carbonato de calcio, CI Pigment White 18, Carbonato cálcico
et: E170(i), Kaltsiumkarbonaat, CI valge pigment 18
eu: E170(i), Kaltzio karbonato
fa: E170(i), کلسیم کربنات
fi: E170(i), Kalsiumkarbonaatti, Kalsiumkarbonaattia, CI Pigment White 18
fr: E170(i), Carbonate de calcium, Pigment blanc C. I. no 18
ga: E170(i), carbónáit chailciam
gl: E170(i), Carbonato de calcio
gv: E170(i), Carboanaayt kelkium
he: E170(i), סידן פחמתי
hi: E170(i), कैल्सियम कार्बोनेट
hr: E170(i), Kalcijev karbonat
hu: E170(i), Kalcium-karbonát, CI Pigment White 18, mészkő
hy: E170(i), Կալցիումի կարբոնատ
id: E170(i), calsium carbonat
is: E170(i), Kalsíumkarbónat
it: E170(i), Carbonato di calcio, CI pigmento bianco 18
ja: E170(i), 炭酸カルシウム, 炭酸Ca, 炭酸Ｃａ
ko: E170(i), 탄산 칼슘
ky: E170(i), Кальций карбонаты
la: E170(i), Carbonatum calcii
lt: E170(i), Kalcio karbonatas, Baltasis pigmentas CI Nr. 18
lv: E170(i), Kalcija karbonāts, CI baltais pigments 18
mk: E170(i), Калциум карбонат
ml: E170(i), ചുണ്ണാമ്പ്
mr: E170(i), कॅल्शियम कार्बोनेट
mt: E170(i), Karbonat tal-kalċju, CI Pigment White 18
my: E170(i), Kalsium karbonat
nb: E170(i), kalsiumkarbonat
nl: E170(i), Calciumcarbonaat, CI Pigment White 18
nn: E170(i), kalsiumkarbonat
oc: E170(i), Carbonat de calci
pl: E170(i), Węglan wapnia, CI Pigment biały 18
pt: E170(i), Carbonato de cálcio, Pigmento branco CI 18
ro: E170(i), Carbonat de calciu, Pigment alb CI 18
ru: E170(i), карбонат кальция, стабилизатор кальция карбонат
sh: E170(i), Kalcijum karbonat
si: E170(i), කැල්සියම් කාබනේට්
sk: E170(i), Uhličitan vápenatý, CI pigment biely 18
sl: E170(i), Kalcijev karbonat, CI Pigment White 18
sr: E170(i), калцијум карбонат
sv: E170(i), Kalciumkarbonat, CI Pigment White 18
ta: E170(i), கால்சியம் கார்பனேட்
th: E170(i), แคลเซียมคาร์บอเนต
tr: E170(i), Kalsiyum karbonat
uk: E170(i), Карбонат кальцію
uz: E170(i), Kalsiy karbonat
vi: E170(i), canxi cacbonat
zh: E170(i), 碳酸鈣

en: E170(ii), Calcium hydrogen carbonate, Calcium bicarbonate, Calcium acid carbonate
xx: E170(ii)
ar: E170(ii), بيكربونات الكالسيوم
ca: E170(ii), Hidrogencarbonat de calci
cs: E170(ii), Hydrogenuhličitan vápenatý
da: E170(ii), calciumhydrogenkarbonat, calciumhydrogencarbonat
de: E170(ii), Calciumhydrogencarbonat, Calciumbicarbonat
el: E170(ii), όξινο ανθρακικό ασβέστιο
eo: E170(ii), kalcia hidrogenkarbonato
es: E170(ii), carbonato ácido de calcio
eu: E170(ii), kaltzio hidrogenokarbonato
fa: E170(ii), کلسیم بی‌کربنات
fi: E170(ii), kalsiumvetykarbonaatti
fr: E170(ii), carbonate acide de calcium, bicarbonate de calcium
hu: E170(ii), Kalcium-hidrogén-karbonát, kalcium-bikarbonát
it: E170(ii), idrogenocarbonato di calcio, bicarbonato di calcio
ja: E170(ii), 炭酸水素カルシウム
ms: E170(ii), kalsium hidrogen karbonat, Kalsium bikarbonat
nl: E170(ii), calciumwaterstofcarbonaat, calciumbicarbonaat
pl: E170(ii), Wodorowęglan wapnia
pt: E170(ii), carbonato ácido de cálcio
ru: E170(ii), Гидрокарбонат кальция
sh: E170(ii), Kalcijum bikarbonat
sr: E170(ii), Kalcijum bikarbonat
sv: E170(ii), kalciumvätekarbonat, kalciumbikarbonat
ta: E170(ii), கால்சியம் பைகார்பனேட்டு
th: E170(ii), แคลเซียมไบคาร์บอเนต
uk: E170(ii), Калійні солі
vi: E170(ii), Canxi bicacbonat
zh: E170(ii), 碳酸氫鈣

en: E171, Titanium dioxide, titanium dioxide color
xx: E171
ar: E171, ثنائي أكسيد التيتانيوم
be: E171, Аксід тытану
bg: E171, Титанов диоксид, Титанов двуокис, Титаниев двуокис, Титаниев диоксид
bs: E171, Titanij dioksid
ca: E171, Diòxid de titani, dioxid de titani
cs: E171, Oxid titaničitý, TiO2, kysličník titaničitý
da: E171, Titandioxid, Titanoxid
de: E171, Titandioxid, Titan(IV)-oxid, TiO2, Titanweiss, Rutilweiß
el: E171, Διοξειδιο του τιτανιου
eo: E171, titana dioksido
es: E171, Dióxido de titanio, Óxido de titanio, Oxido de titanio(IV)
et: E171, Titaandioksiid
fa: E171, تیتانیوم دی اکسید
fi: E171, Titaanidioksidi, Titaanivalkoinen, Titaani(IV)oksidi, Titaanioksidi, Tio2, Titaanidioksidia, Titaanivalkoista, Titaani(IV)oksidia, Titaanioksidia
fr: E171, Oxyde de titane, dioxyde de titane, bioxyde de titane, CI Pigment White 6
ga: E171, dé-ocsaíd tíotáiniam
he: E171, טיטניום דו-חמצני
hi: E171, टाइटानियम डाइऑक्साइड
hu: E171, Titán-dioxid
hy: E171, Տիտանի երկօքսիդ
id: E171, Titanium dioksida
is: E171, Títandíoxíð
it: E171, Biossido di titanio, Diossido di titanio, TiO2
ja: E171, 酸化チタン
ko: E171, 이산화 타이타늄
ky: E171, Титан оксиддери
lt: E171, Titano dioksidas, Titano baltalai
lv: E171, Titāna dioksīds
ml: E171, ടൈറ്റാനിയം ഡൈഓക്സൈഡ്
ms: E171, Titanium dioksida
mt: E171, Diossidu tat-titanju
nb: E171, titandioxid
nl: E171, Titaandioxide, Titanium(IV)oxide, Titaniumoxide, Titaniumdioxide, Titanium dioxide, Titaanwit
pl: E171, Dwutlenek tytanu, tlenek tytanu(IV), ditlenek tytanu, biel tytanowa, tytanu dwutlenek
pt: E171, Dióxido de titânio, Óxido de titânio
ro: E171, Dioxid de titan, Bioxid de titan
ru: E171, Титана диоксид, оксид титана(IV), TiO2, двуокись титана, оксид титана, белила титановые, титановые белила, диоксид титана
sh: E171, Titanijum dioksid
si: E171, ටයිටේනියම් ඩයොක්සයිඩ්
sk: E171, Oxid titaničitý, Titánová beloba
sl: E171, Titanov dioksid
sr: E171, титанијум диоксид
sv: E171, Titandioxid, Titaniumdioxid, TiO2, Titansyra
ta: E171, தைட்டானியம் ஈராக்சைடு
tr: E171, Titanyum dioksit
uk: E171, Білила титанові
vi: E171, Titani dioxide
zh: E171, 二氧化鈦

en: E172, Iron oxides and iron hydroxides
xx: E172
bg: E172, Железни оксиди и железни хидроксиди
ca: E172, Òxids i hidròxids de ferro, oxids i hidroxids de ferro
cs: E172, Oxidy a hydroxidy železa
da: E172, Jernoxider og jernhydroxider
de: E172, Eisenoxide und Eisenhydroxide, Eisenoxid, Eisenoxide, Eisenhydroxid, Eisenhydroxide
el: E172, Οξειδια του σιδηρου και υδροξειδια του σιδηρου συνώνυμα
es: E172, Óxidos e hidróxidos de hierro
et: E172, Raudoksiidid ja raudhüdroksiidid
fi: E172, Rautaoksidit ja -hydroksidit, Rautaoksideja ja -hydroksideja
fr: E172, Oxyde et hydroxyde de fer, Oxydes de fer et hydroxydes de fer
hr: E172, željezo oksidi i hidroksidi
hu: E172, Vas-oxidok és vas-hidroxidok
it: E172, Ossidi di ferro e idrossidi di ferro
lt: E172, Geležies oksidai ir geležies hidroksidai
lv: E172, Dzelzs oksīdi un dzelzs hidroksīdi
mt: E172, Ossidi tal-ħadid u idrossidi tal-ħadid
nl: E172, Ijzeroxiden en -hydroxiden, ijzeroxide
pl: E172, Tlenki żelaza i wodorotlenki żelaza, tlenki żelaza, tlenki i wodorotlenki żelaza, tlenek żelaza
pt: E172, Óxidos de ferro e hidróxidos de ferro
ro: E172, Oxizi și hidroxizi de fier, oxizi de fier și hidroxizi de fier
ru: E172, Оксид железа желтый
sk: E172, Oxidy a hydroxidy železa
sl: E172, Železovi oksidi in hidroksidi
sv: E172, Järnoxider och järnhydroxider, järnoxid, järnoxider

en: E172(i), Black iron oxide
xx: E172(i)
bg: E172(i), Черен оксид на желязо
cs: E172(i), Černý oxid železa
da: E172(i), Sort jernoxid
de: E172(i), Eisenoxidschwarz, Schwarzes Eisenoxid
el: E172(i), Μαύρος οξείδιο του σιδήρου
es: E172(i), Óxido de hierro negro
et: E172(i), Must rauaoksiid
fi: E172(i), Musta rautaoksidi, marsmusta, Mustaa rautaoksidia, marsmustaa
fr: E172(i), Oxyde de fer noir
hu: E172(i), Fekete vas-oxid
it: E172(i), Ossido di ferro nero
lt: E172(i), Juodasis geležies oksidas
lv: E172(i), Melnais dzelzs oksīds
mt: E172(i), Ossidu iswed tal-ħadid
nl: E172(i), Zwart ijzeroxide
pl: E172(i), Czarny tlenek żelaza
pt: E172(i), Óxido de ferro preto
ro: E172(i), Oxid de fier negru
sk: E172(i), Čierny oxid železa
sl: E172(i), Črni železov oksid
sv: E172(i), Svart järnoxid

en: E172(ii), Red iron oxide, iron(III) oxide, ferric oxide
xx: E172(ii)
ar: E172(ii), أكسيد الحديد الأحمر
az: E172(ii), Qırmızı dəmir oksidi
bg: E172(ii), Червен железен оксид
ca: E172(ii), Òxid de ferro vermell
cs: E172(ii), Oxid železitý, Fe2O3
da: E172(ii), Rød jernoxid
de: E172(ii), Eisen(III)-oxid, Fe2O3, Oxidrot, Dieisentrioxid, Eisenoxidrot
el: E172(ii), Κόκκινο οξείδιο του σιδήρου
es: E172(ii), Óxido de hierro rojo, Óxido férrico, Fe2O3, herrumbre, óxido de hierro, sesquióxido de hierro, trióxido de hierro, óxido de hierro (III)
et: E172(ii), Raud(III)oksiid, Punane raudoksiid
fa: E172(ii), اکسید آهن سرخ
fi: E172(ii), Punainen rautaoksidi, Rauta(III)oksidi, Dirautatrioksidi, Ferrioksidi, Punaista rautaoksidia, Rauta(III)oksidia, Dirautatrioksidia, Ferrioksidia
fr: E172(ii), Oxyde de fer rouge, oxyde et hydroxyde de fer rouge, oxyde de fer(III), Oxyde ferrique, Trioxide de difer, Oxyde de fer, Fe2O3
he: E172(ii), תחמוצת ברזל אדומה
hr: E172(ii), Crveni željezov oksid
hu: E172(ii), Vas(III)-oxid, vörös vas-oxid, ferri-oxid, vas-vörös-oxid
id: E172(ii), Besi(III) oksida merah
it: E172(ii), Ossido di ferro rosso, ossido ferrico, Sesquiossido di ferro, Fe2O3
ja: E172(ii), 酸化鉄(III)
ko: E172(ii), 산화철(III) 적색
lt: E172(ii), Raudonasis geležies oksidas
lv: E172(ii), Sarkanais dzelzs oksīds
mk: E172(ii), Црвен железен оксид
nl: E172(ii), IJzer(III)oxide, Fe203, Rood ijzeroxide
pl: E172(ii), Czerwony tlenek żelaza, Tlenek żelaza(III), Tritlenek diżelaza
pt: E172(ii), Óxido de ferro vermelho, óxido de ferro(III), Óxido de ferro, Óxido férrico, Óxido de ferro III, Trióxido de diferro
ro: E172(ii), Oxid de fier roșu
ru: E172(ii), Красный оксид железа, оксид железа(III)
sk: E172(ii), Oxid železitý, Červený oxid železa
sl: E172(ii), Železov(III) oksid, Rdeči železov oksid
sq: E172(ii), Oksid hekuri i kuq
sr: E172(ii), Црвени оксид гвожђа
sv: E172(ii), Järn(III)oxid, Rödrost, Ytrost, Röd järnoxid, järn(III)oxid
th: E172(ii), เหล็กออกไซด์สีแดง
tr: E172(ii), Kırmızı demir oksit
uk: E172(ii), Червоний оксид заліза
vi: E172(ii), Oxit sắt đỏ
zh: E172(ii), 红色氧化铁

en: E172(iii), Yellow iron oxide
xx: E172(iii)
bg: E172(iii), Жълт оксид на желязо
cs: E172(iii), Žlutý oxid železa
da: E172(iii), Gul jernoxid
de: E172(iii), Eisenoxidgelb, Gelbes Eisenoxid
el: E172(iii), Κίτρινο οξείδιο του σιδήρου
es: E172(iii), Óxido de hierro amarillo
et: E172(iii), Kollane rauaoksiid
fi: E172(iii), Keltainen rautaoksidi, keltaokra, minette, keltamusta, keltaterra, Keltaista rautaoksidia, keltaokraa, minetteä, keltamustaa, keltaterraa
fr: E172(iii), Oxyde de fer jaune, oxyde et hydroxyde de fer jaune et rouge, oxyde et hydroxyde de fer jaune
hu: E172(iii), Sárga vas-oxid, vas-sárga-oxid
it: E172(iii), Ossido di ferro giallo
lt: E172(iii), Geltonasis geležies oksidas
lv: E172(iii), Dzelzs oksīds dzeltenais
mt: E172(iii), Ossidu iswed tal-ħadid isfar
nl: E172(iii), Geel ijzeroxide
pl: E172(iii), Żółty tlenek żelaza
pt: E172(iii), Óxido de ferro amarelo
ro: E172(iii), Oxid de fier galben
sk: E172(iii), Žltý oxid železa
sl: E172(iii), Rumeno železov oksid
sv: E172(iii), Gul järnoxid

en: E173, Aluminium, Aluminum, element 13
xx: E173
bg: E173, Алуминий
ca: E173, Alumini
cs: E173, Hliník, CI kovový pigment
da: E173, Aluminium
de: E173, Aluminium
el: E173, Αργιλιο (αλουμινιο), αργίλιο
es: E173, Aluminio
et: E173, Alumiinium
fi: E173, Alumiini, Alumiinia
fr: E173, Aluminium
hu: E173, Alumínium
it: E173, Alluminio
lt: E173, Aliuminis
lv: E173, Alumīnijs
mt: E173, Aluminju
nl: E173, Aluminium
pl: E173, Glin
pt: E173, Alumínio
ro: E173, Aluminiu
ru: E173, Алюминий
sk: E173, Hliník
sl: E173, Aluminij
sv: E173, Aluminium

en: E174, Silver, element 47
xx: E174
bg: E174, Сребро
ca: E174, Plata
cs: E174, Stříbro, Argentum
da: E174, Sølv
de: E174, Silber
el: E174, Αργυρος, ασήμι
es: E174, Plata
et: E174, Hõbe
fi: E174, Hopea, Hopeaa
fr: E174, Argent
hu: E174, Ezüst
it: E174, Argento
lt: E174, Sidabras
lv: E174, Sudrabs
mt: E174, Fidda
nl: E174, Zilver
pl: E174, Srebro
pt: E174, Prata
ro: E174, Argint
sk: E174, Striebro
sl: E174, Srebro
sv: E174, Silver

en: E175, Gold, Pigment Metal 3, element 79
xx: E175
bg: E175, Злато, Метален пигмент 3
ca: E175, Or
cs: E175, Zlato, Kovový pigment 3, Aurum
da: E175, Guld, Pigment Metal 3
de: E175, Gold, Metal 3
el: E175, Χρυσος, Μεταλλικό χρώμα 3
es: E175, Oro, aurífero, aurífera
et: E175, Kuld, Metalne pigment 3
fi: E175, Kulta, Kultaa
fr: E175, Or, Pigment métallique no 3
hu: E175, Arany
it: E175, Oro, Pigmento metallico 3
lt: E175, Auksas, Metalo pigmentas Nr. 3
lv: E175, Zelts, Metāla pigments 3
mt: E175, Deheb
nl: E175, Goud, Pigmentmetaal 3
pl: E175, Złoto, Pigment metaliczny 3
pt: E175, Ouro, Pigmento metálico 3
ro: E175, Aur, Pigment metalic 3
sk: E175, Zlato, Kovový pigment 3
sl: E175, Zlato
sv: E175, Guld, Pigment Metal 3

en: E180, Litholrubine bk, CI Pigment Red 57, Rubinpigment, Pigment Rubine, Lithol rubine bk
xx: E180
bg: E180, Литолрубин bk, CI червен пигмент 57, рубин пигмент
ca: E180, Litol-Rubina BK, Pigment Rubí, pigment rubi
cs: E180, Litholrubin bk, CI červený pigment 57, rubínový pigment
da: E180, Rubinpigment bk, litholrubin bk, CI Pigment Red 57
de: E180, Litholrubin BK, E 180, Litholrubin, Rubinpigment BK
el: E180, Λιθορουμπινη βκ, Κόκκινο CI Pigment 57, rubinpigment
es: E180, Litolrubina bk, CI Pigment Red 57, rubinpigment, Litol-rubina BK
et: E180, Litoolrubiin bk, CI punane pigment 57, rubiinpigment
fi: E180, Litolirubiini bk, CI Pigment Red 57, Rubiinipigmentti, Rubiinipigmenttiä
fr: E180, Lithol-rubine BK, Litholrubine BK, Pigment Rubine, Carmin 6B, Lithol rubine BK, TANNIC ACID, Fuchsine lithol BK, D&C Red No. 7, D et C Red No. 7, Carmine 6B, Brilliant Carmine 6B, Permanent Rubin L6B, Litholrubine, Latolrubine, C.I. Pigment Red 57, C.I. Pigment Red 57:1, C.I. 15850:1, Rubinpigment BK, Rubinpigment, 4B-Toner, pigmento rubí, carmín 6B, CI 15850, D&C red 7, Lithol rubin toner BKL, Pigment rouge C. I. no 57, pigment rubis
hu: E180, Litolrubin BK, CI Pigment Red 57, Rubinpigment
it: E180, Litolrubino bk, CI pigmento rosso 57, pigmento rubino
lt: E180, Litolrubinas bk, Raudonasis pigmentas CI Nr. 57, rubino pigmentas
lv: E180, Litolrubīns bk, CI Sarkanais pigments 57, rubīnpigments
mt: E180, Litolrubina bk
nl: E180, Litholrubine bk, CI Pigment Red 57, robijnpigment
pl: E180, Czerwień litolowa bk, CI pigment czerwony 57, pigment rubinowy
pt: E180, Litolrubina bk, Pigmento vermelho CI 57, pigmento de rubina
ro: E180, Litolrubină bk, Pigment Roșu CI 57, Pigment de rubin
sk: E180, Litolrubín bk, CI pigment červený 57, rubínový pigment
sl: E180, Litolrubin bk, CI Pigment Red 57, rubinpigment
sv: E180, Litolrubin bk, CI Pigment Red 57, rubinpigment, E 180

en: E181, Tannin
xx: E181
af: E181, Tannien
ar: E181, تانين
az: E181, Tannin
bg: E181, Танин
ca: E181, Taní
cs: E181, Třísloviny, Tříslovina, Taniny, Tanin
da: E181, Tannin, Garvesyre, Tanin
de: E181, Tannine, E 181, Gerbsäure
el: E181, Τανίνη
es: E181, Tanino, E 181, Taninos
et: E181, Tanniin
fi: E181, Tanniinit, Tanniini, Parkkihappo, Tanniineja, Tanniinia, Parkkihappoa
fr: E181, Tannin, acide tannique, Tanin, Tannins, 1401-55-4, Tanins
he: E181, טַנִין
hi: E181, टैनिन
hr: E181, Tanin
hu: E181, Csersav, Tannin, digalluszsav
id: E181, Tanin
it: E181, Tannino, Tannini
ja: E181, タンニン
ko: E181, 탄닌
lt: E181, Taninas, Taninai
lv: E181, Tanīns
mk: E181, Танин
ms: E181, Tanin
nl: E181, Looizuur, Tannine
pl: E181, Taniny, Tanina
pt: E181, Tanino, Taninos, Tanante
ro: E181, Tanin, Taninuri
ru: E181, Танин
sk: E181, Tanín
sl: E181, Čreslovina, Tanini, Tanin, Čreslovine
sq: E181, Tanin
sr: E181, Танин
sv: E181, Tannin, Garvsyra
th: E181, แทนนิน
tr: E181, Tanen
uk: E181, Танін
vi: E181, Tanin
zh: E181, 丹宁酸

en: E182, Orcein
xx: E182
ar: E182, أورسين
az: E182, Orsein
bg: E182, Орсеин
ca: E182, Orceïna
cs: E182, Orcein, Orceiny
da: E182, Orcein
de: E182, Orcein, 7-Hydroxy-2-phenoxazon, 7-Amino-2-phenoxazon, 7-Amino-2-phenoxazim
el: E182, Ορσεΐνη
eo: E182, Orceino
es: E182, Orceína, Orcina, E 182
et: E182, Orseiin
fi: E182, Orseiini, Orseiinia
fr: E182, Orseille, Orcéine, Orseille orcéine
he: E182, אורצאין
hr: E182, Orcein
hu: E182, Orcein
id: E182, Orcein
it: E182, Orceina
ja: E182, オルセイン
ko: E182, 오르세인
lt: E182, Orceinas
lv: E182, Orceīns
mk: E182, Орцеин
mt: E182, Orcein
nl: E182, Orcein
pl: E182, Orceina
pt: E182, Orceína
ro: E182, Orchil
ru: E182, Орцеин
sk: E182, Orceín
sl: E182, Orcein
sq: E182, Orcein
sr: E182, Орцеин
sv: E182, Orcein
th: E182, ออร์ซีน
tr: E182, Orsein
uk: E182, Орцеїн
vi: E182, Orcein
zh: E182, 奥cein